Maine, session 132, LD1735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the portion of contributions
to an account established under a qualified ABLE program that complies with the
requirements of the federal Achieving a Better Life Experience Act of 2014, Public
Law 113‑295, up to $1,000 per eligible individual. This deduction may not be claimed
when federal adjusted gross income exceeds $100,000 for a single individual and
married persons filing separate returns or $200,000 for individuals filing married joint
returns and heads of households.